Illinois, session 104th, HB3477.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Small 5Business Financing Transparency Act. 6    Section 2. Purpose and construction. The purpose of this 7Act is to protect small businesses. This Act shall be 8liberally construed to effectuate its purpose. 9    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:10    "Advance fee" means any consideration that is charged or 11collected by a broker prior to the closing of a commercial 12financing transaction.13    "Applicant" means a person who has submitted an 14application for a registration under this Act. 15    "Broker" means any person who, for compensation or the 16expectation of compensation, obtains a commercial financing 17transaction or an offer for a commercial financing transaction 18from a third party that would, if executed, be binding upon 19that third party and communicates that offer to a business 20located in this State. The term "broker" excludes a provider, 21or any individual or entity whose compensation is not based or 22dependent on the terms of the specific commercial financing   HB3477 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1transaction obtained or offered.2    "Closed-end financing" means a closed-end extension of 3credit, secured or unsecured, that the recipient does not 4intend to use for personal, family, or household purposes. 5"Closed-end financing" includes financing with an established 6principal amount and duration.7    "Commercial financing" means open-end financing, 8closed-end financing, sales-based financing, factoring 9transaction, or other form of financing, the proceeds of which 10the recipient does not intend to use primarily for personal, 11family, or household purposes. For purposes of determining 12whether a financing is a commercial financing, the provider 13may rely on any statement of intended purposes by the 14recipient. The statement may be a separate statement signed by 15the recipient; may be contained in the financing application, 16financing agreement, or other document signed or consented to 17by the recipient; or may be provided orally by the recipient so 18long as it is documented in the recipient's application file 19by the provider. Electronic signatures and consents are valid 20for purposes of the foregoing sentence. The provider shall not 21be required to ascertain that the proceeds of a commercial 22financing are used in accordance with the recipient's 23statement of intended purposes.24    "Commercial financing facility" means a commercial 25financing agreement pursuant to which the provider reasonably 26contemplates repeated transactions with the recipient over a   HB3477 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1period of time, and the agreement sets forth the terms and 2conditions governing the use of the facility. "Commercial 3financing facility" includes, but is not limited to, open-end 4financing.5    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 6Professional Regulation.7    "Division of Financial Institutions" or "Division" means 8the Division of Financial Institutions of the Department of 9Financial and Professional Regulation. 10    "Factoring transaction" means an accounts receivable 11purchase transaction that includes an agreement to purchase, 12transfer, or sell a legally enforceable claim for payment held 13by a recipient for goods the recipient has supplied or 14services the recipient has rendered that have been ordered but 15for which payment has not yet been made.16    "Finance charge" means the cost of financing as a dollar 17amount. "Finance charge" includes any charge payable directly 18or indirectly by the recipient and imposed directly or 19indirectly by the provider as an incident to or a condition of 20the extension of financing. For the purposes of a factoring 21transaction, "finance charge" includes the discount taken on 22the face value of the accounts receivable.23    "Open-end financing" means an agreement for one or more 24extensions of open-end credit, secured or unsecured, that the 25recipient does not intend to use the proceeds of primarily for 26personal, family, or household purposes. "Open-end financing"   HB3477 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1includes credit extended by a provider under a plan in which: 2(i) the provider reasonably contemplates repeated 3transactions; (ii) the provider may impose a finance charge 4from time to time on an outstanding unpaid balance; and (iii) 5the amount of credit that may be extended to the recipient 6during the term of the plan is generally made available to the 7extent that any outstanding balance is repaid.8    "Person" means an individual, entity, corporation, 9partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, 10association, joint stock company, trust, or unincorporated 11organization, including, but not limited to, a sole 12proprietorship. 13    "Provider" means a person who extends a specific offer of 14commercial financing to a recipient. The mere extension of a 15specific offer or provision of disclosures for a commercial 16financing, is not sufficient to conclude that a provider is 17originating, making, funding, or providing commercial 18financing. "Provider" does not include:19        (1) a bank, trust company, or industrial loan company, 20    or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, doing business 21    under the authority of, or in accordance with, a license, 22    certificate, or charter issued by the United States, this 23    State, or any other state, district, territory, or 24    commonwealth of the United States that is authorized to 25    transact business in this State;26        (2) a federally chartered savings and loan   HB3477 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    association, federal savings bank, or federal credit 2    union, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, that is 3    authorized to transact business in this State;4        (3) a savings and loan association, savings bank, or 5    credit union, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, 6    organized under the laws of this State or any other state 7    that is authorized to transact business in this State;8        (4) a lender regulated under the federal Farm Credit 9    Act; and10        (5) a person acting as a technology services provider 11    to an entity described by sub-paragraphs (1), (2), or (3) 12    for use as part of that entity's commercial financing 13    program, provided the person has no interest, or 14    arrangement, or agreement to purchase any interest in the 15    commercial financing extended by the entity in connection 16    with the program.17    "Recipient" means a person located in the State of 18Illinois who applies for commercial financing and is made a 19specific offer of commercial financing by a provider. For the 20purpose of determining whether a recipient is located in 21Illinois, a provider may rely upon (i) any written 22representation by the recipient as to whether it is located in 23Illinois; or (ii) the business address provided by the 24recipient in the application for commercial financing showing 25that the recipient is located in Illinois. "Recipient" does 26not include a person acting as a broker.   HB3477 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    "Sales-based financing" means a transaction that is repaid 2by the recipient to the provider, over time, as a percentage of 3sales or revenue, in which the payment amount may increase or 4decrease according to the volume of sales made or revenue 5received by the recipient or a transaction that includes a 6true-up mechanism where the financing is repaid as a fixed 7payment but provides for a reconciliation process that adjusts 8the payment to an amount that is a percentage of sales or 9revenue.10    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 11Professional Regulation or a person authorized by the 12Secretary to perform the Secretary's responsibilities under 13this Act. 14    "Specific offer" means the specific terms of commercial 15financing, including price or amount, that is quoted in 16writing to a recipient based on information obtained from or 17about the recipient that, if accepted by a recipient, shall be 18binding on the provider, as applicable, subject to any 19specific requirements stated in the specific terms.20    "True-up mechanism" means, with respect to sales-based 21financing, a contractual arrangement with all the following 22elements:23        (1) The financer receives periodic payments based upon 24    a pre-set amount stated in the contract.25        (2) The contract allows the recipient to request, or 26    the financer to initiate, adjustments to the payment   HB3477 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    amount, credits to the recipient, or charges to the 2    recipient after execution of the contract, so that the 3    total amount paid by the recipient more closely reflects a 4    split rate listed in the contract. 5    Section 10. Applicability.6    (a) The provisions of this Act do not apply to:7        (1) a bank, trust company, or industrial loan company, 8    or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, doing business 9    under the authority of, or in accordance with, a license, 10    certificate or charter issued by the United States, this 11    State, or any other state, district, territory, or 12    commonwealth of the United States that is authorized to 13    transact business in this State;14        (2) a federally chartered savings and loan 15    association, federal savings bank, or federal credit 16    union, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, that is 17    authorized to transact business in this State;18        (3) a savings and loan association, savings bank, or 19    credit union, or any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, 20    organized under the laws of this State or any other state 21    that is authorized to transact business in this State;22        (4) a lender regulated under the federal Farm Credit 23    Act; and24        (5) a person acting in the person's capacity as a 25    technology services provider to an entity described by   HB3477 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    sub-paragraphs (1), (2), or (3) for use as part of that 2    entity's commercial financing program, provided the person 3    has no interest, or arrangement, or agreement to purchase 4    any interest in the commercial financing extended by the 5    entity in connection with the program.  6    Section 15. Division of Financial Institutions. This Act 7shall be administered by the Division on behalf of the 8Secretary. 9    Section 20. Registration requirement. 10    (a) It is unlawful for a person to engage in the conduct 11regulated by this Act as a broker or provider unless the broker 12or provider: (i) registers with the Secretary in accordance 13with this Section; and (ii) maintains a valid registration. An 14officer or employee of a person required to register under 15this Section is not required to register if the person for whom 16the individual is an officer or employee is registered.17    (b) Application for registration and renewal of 18registration shall be made in accordance with this Act and 19with the requirements of the multistate licensing system, if 20required by the Secretary. The application shall be in 21writing, under oath, and on a form obtained from and 22prescribed by the Secretary. The Secretary may change or 23update the form to carry out the purposes of this Act. The 24Secretary may require part or all of the application to be   HB3477 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1submitted electronically, with attestation, to the multistate 2licensing system.3    (c) Registrants shall apply to renew their registration 4every calendar year. Registrants may submit properly completed 5renewal application forms and filing fees 60 days before the 6registration expiration date, and the same shall be received 7by the Secretary at least 30 days before the registration 8expiration date. Absent a written extension from the 9Department, a registration shall expire on December 31 of each 10year if a registrant fails to timely submit a properly 11completed renewal application and fees.12    (d) Upon receipt of the registration, a registrant is 13authorized to engage in conduct regulated by this Act. The 14registration shall remain in full force and effect until it 15expires, is withdrawn by the registrant, or is revoked or 16suspended as provided in this Act.17    (e) To register under this Section, an applicant shall:18        (1) pay a registration fee of $2,500 to the 19    Department; and20        (2) submit a registration statement containing the 21    information described in subsection (g).22    (f) To renew a registration under this Section, a person 23shall:24        (1) pay the annual fee of $2,500 to the Department; 25    and26        (2) submit a renewal statement containing the   HB3477 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    information described in subsection (g).2    (g) A registration or renewal statement must be submitted 3to the Secretary or to a multistate licensing system as 4approved by the Secretary. The registration or renewal 5statement shall include:6        (1) the name of the person;7        (2) the name in which the business will be transacted 8    if different from that required in paragraph (1), which 9    must be properly registered as an assumed corporate name 10    under the Business Corporation Act of 1983, an assumed 11    limited liability company name under the Limited Liability 12    Company Act, or an assumed business name under the Assumed 13    Business Name Act; 14        (3) the address of the person's principal business 15    office; 16        (4) the address of each office in this State at which 17    the person engages in commercial financing transactions; 18        (5) if the person engages in brokering or providing 19    commercial financing transactions in this State but does 20    not maintain an office in this State, a brief description 21    of the manner in which the business is conducted; 22        (6) if the person conducts business through an agent 23    located in this State, the name and address in this State 24    of the person's agent properly registered with the 25    Secretary of State; 26        (7) for a registration application, whether the   HB3477 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    person, an officer, director, manager, operator, or 2    principal of the person, or an employee of the person 3    engaged in the business of commercial financing has been 4    convicted of a crime involving an act of fraud, 5    dishonesty, breach of trust, or money laundering; if the 6    applicant answers yes to this paragraph, then the 7    applicant shall report the names, titles or relationship 8    to the applicant or registrant, and the nature of the 9    covered crime;10        (8) for a renewal application, whether, in the past 11    year, the person, an officer, director, manager, operator, 12    or principal of the person, or an employee of the person 13    engaged in the business of commercial financing has been 14    convicted of a crime involving an act of fraud, 15    dishonesty, breach of trust, or money laundering; if the 16    registrant answers yes to this paragraph, then the 17    registrant shall report the names, titles or relationship 18    to the applicant or registrant, and the nature of the 19    covered crime; and20        (9) a statement of the person's commitment to abide by 21    the requirements of registering persons under this Act.22    (h) The Department shall adopt and amend rules as may be 23required for the proper administration and enforcement of this 24Section, including rules providing for the form, content, and 25filing of a registration and renewal statement.   HB3477 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    Section 25. Additional registration information. 2    (a) In order to fulfill the purposes of this Act, the 3Secretary may establish relationships or contracts with a 4multistate licensing system or other persons to collect and 5maintain records and process fees related to registrants or 6other persons subject to this Act. 7    (b) For the purposes of this Section, and to reduce the 8points of contact that the Secretary may have to maintain, the 9Secretary may use a multistate licensing system as a 10channeling agent for requesting and distributing information 11to and from any source. 12    (c) Each registrant shall furnish to the Secretary or 13multistate licensing system an updated business address within 1430 days after any change of business address. 15    Section 30. Registration expiration. No activity regulated 16by this Act shall be conducted by a registrant whose 17registration has expired. The Secretary shall reinstate an 18expired registration upon payment of the renewal fee, payment 19of a reactivation fee equal to 2 times the renewal fee, and 20submission of a completed renewal application. 21    Section 35. Functions; powers; duties. The functions, 22powers, and duties of the Secretary include, but are not 23limited to, the following: 24        (1) to issue any registration or renewal;   HB3477 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1        (2) to revoke or suspend for cause any registration 2    issued under this Act; 3        (3) to keep records of all registrations issued under 4    this Act; 5        (4) to receive, consider, investigate, and act upon 6    complaints made by any person in connection with any 7    registration in this State or unregistered commercial 8    brokering or financing activity of any person; 9        (5) to adopt rules necessary and proper for the 10    administration of this Act; 11        (6) to subpoena documents and witnesses and compel 12    their attendance and production, to administer oaths, and 13    to require the production of any books, papers, or other 14    materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this Act 15    or its implementing rules; 16        (7) to issue orders against any person if the 17    Secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an unlawful 18    practice has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur; 19    if any person is violating, or is about to violate any law, 20    rule, or written agreement with the Secretary; or for the 21    purpose of administering the provisions of this Act and 22    any rule adopted in accordance with this Act; 23        (8) to address any inquiries to any registrant, or the 24    owners, officers, or directors thereof, in relation to its 25    activities and conditions, or any other matter connected 26    with its affairs, and any registrant or person so   HB3477 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    addressed shall promptly reply in writing to those 2    inquiries. The Secretary may also require reports from any 3    registrant at any time the Secretary deems desirable; 4        (9) to enforce provisions of this Act and its 5    implementing rules;6        (10) to levy fees, including, but not limited to, 7    assessments, registration fees, civil penalties, and 8    charges for services performed in administering this Act. 9    The Secretary may establish and modify fees by rule. The 10    aggregate of all fees collected by the Secretary under 11    this Act shall be paid promptly after receipt into the 12    Financial Institution Fund. The amounts deposited into the 13    Financial Institution Fund shall be used for the ordinary 14    and contingent expenses of the Department. Nothing in this 15    Act prevents paying expenses including salaries, 16    retirement, social security, and State-paid insurance of 17    State employees, or any other expenses incurred under this 18    Act by appropriation from the General Revenue Fund or any 19    other fund; 20        (11) to issue refunds to registrants of any 21    overpayment for good cause shown; 22        (12) to appoint experts and special assistants as 23    needed to effectively and efficiently administer this Act; 24        (13) to conduct hearings for the purpose of 25    suspensions, denials, or revocations of registrations, 26    fining, or other discipline of registrants or unregistered   HB3477 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    persons or entities;2        (14) to exercise visitorial power over a registrant if 3    the Secretary has reasonable cause to believe that a 4    person is violating or is about to violate this Act;5        (15) to impose civil penalties of up to $200 per day 6    against a registrant for failing to respond to a 7    regulatory request or reporting requirement; and 8        (16) to enter into agreements in connection with a 9    multistate licensing system. 10    Section 40. Subpoena power of the Secretary. 11    (a) The Secretary may issue and serve subpoenas and 12subpoenas duces tecum to compel the attendance of witnesses 13and the production of all books, accounts, records, and other 14documents and materials relevant to an investigation. The 15Secretary, or the Secretary's duly authorized representative, 16may administer oaths and affirmations to any person. 17    (b) If a person does not comply with the Secretary's 18subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, the Secretary may, through 19the Attorney General, petition the circuit court of the county 20in which the subpoenaed person resides or has its principal 21place of business for an order requiring the subpoenaed person 22to testify and to comply with the subpoena duces tecum. The 23court may grant injunctive relief restraining the person from 24engaging in activity regulated by this Act. The court may 25grant other relief, including, but not limited to, the   HB3477 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1restraint, by injunction or appointment of a receiver, of any 2transfer, pledge, assignment, or other disposition of the 3person's assets, concealment, destruction, or other 4disposition of books, accounts, records, or other documents 5and materials, as the court deems appropriate, until the 6person has fully complied with the subpoena or subpoena duces 7tecum and the Secretary has completed an investigation. 8    (c) If it appears to the Secretary that the compliance 9with a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum issued or caused to be 10issued by the Secretary under this Section is essential to an 11investigation, the Secretary, in addition to the other 12remedies provided for in this Act, may, through the Attorney 13General, apply for relief to the circuit court of the county in 14which the subpoenaed person resides or has its principal place 15of business. The court shall thereupon direct the issuance of 16an order against the subpoenaed person requiring sufficient 17bond conditioned on compliance with the subpoena or subpoena 18duces tecum. The court shall cause to be endorsed on the order 19a suitable amount of bond or payment pursuant to which the 20person named be freed, having a due regard to the nature of the 21case.22    (d) In addition, the Secretary may, through the Attorney 23General, seek a writ of attachment or an equivalent order from 24the circuit court having jurisdiction over the person who has 25refused to obey a subpoena, who has refused to give testimony, 26or who has refused to produce the matters described in the   HB3477 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1subpoena duces tecum. 2    Section 45. Sales-based financing disclosure requirements. 3A provider subject to this Act shall provide the following 4disclosures to a recipient, in a manner prescribed by the 5Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a specific offer of 6sales-based financing:7        (1) The total amount of the commercial financing, and, 8    if different from the financing amount, the disbursement 9    amount after any fees deducted or withheld at 10    disbursement.11        (2) The total cost of the commercial financing, which 12    is the finance charge.13        (3) The total remittance amount.14        (4) The estimated term, which is the period of time 15    required for the initially estimated periodic payments to 16    equal the total remittance amount.17        (5) The estimated payment amounts:18            (A) for payment amounts that are fixed, the 19        payment amounts and frequency, such as, daily, weekly, 20        monthly, and, if the payment frequency is other than 21        monthly, the amount of the average projected payments 22        per month; or23            (B) for payment amounts that are variable, a 24        payment schedule or a description of the method used 25        to calculate the amounts and frequency of payments and   HB3477 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1        the amount of the average projected payments per 2        month.3        (6) A description of all other potential fees and 4    charges not included in the finance charge, including, but 5    not limited to, draw fees, late payment fees, and returned 6    payment fees.7        (7) If the recipient elects to pay off or refinance 8    the commercial financing before full payment, the provider 9    shall disclose:10            (A) whether the recipient would be required to pay 11        any finance charges; if so, disclosure of the maximum 12        dollar amount the recipient could be required to pay; 13        and14            (B) whether the recipient would be required to pay 15        any additional fees not already included in the 16        finance charge.17        (8) A description of collateral requirements or 18    security interests, if any. 19    Section 50. Commercial closed-end financing disclosure 20requirements. A provider subject to this Act shall provide the 21following disclosures to a recipient, in a manner prescribed 22by the Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a specific 23offer for closed-end financing:24        (1) The total amount of the commercial financing, and, 25    if different from the financing amount, the disbursement   HB3477 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    amount after any fees deducted or withheld at 2    disbursement.3        (2) The total cost of the commercial financing, which 4    is the finance charge.5        (3) The total repayment amount, which is the 6    disbursement amount plus the finance charge.7        (4) The term of the financing.8        (5) The payment amounts:9            (A) for payment amounts that are fixed, the 10        payment amounts and frequency, such as daily, weekly, 11        monthly, and, if the payment frequency is other than 12        monthly, the amount of the average projected payments 13        per month; or14            (B) for payment amounts that are variable, a full 15        payment schedule or a description of the method used 16        to calculate the amounts and frequency of payments and 17        the amount of the average projected payments per 18        month.19        (6) A description of all other potential fees and 20    charges that can be avoided by the recipient, including, 21    but not limited to, late payment fees and returned payment 22    fees. 23        (7) If the recipient elects to pay off or refinance 24    the commercial financing before full repayment, the 25    provider shall disclose:26            (A) whether the recipient would be required to pay   HB3477 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1        any finance charges other than interest accrued since 2        their last payment; if so, disclosure of the maximum 3        dollar amount the recipient could be required to pay; 4        and5            (B) whether the recipient would be required to pay 6        any additional fees not already included in the 7        finance charge.8        (8) A description of collateral requirements or 9    security interests, if any. 10    Section 55. Open-end commercial financing disclosure 11requirements. A provider subject to this Act shall provide the 12following disclosures to a recipient, in a manner prescribed 13by the Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a specific 14offer for open-end financing:15        (1) The maximum amount of credit available to the 16    recipient, such as the credit line amount, and the amount 17    scheduled to be drawn by the recipient at the time the 18    offer is extended, if any, less any fees deducted or 19    withheld at disbursement.20        (2) The total cost of the commercial financing, which 21    is the finance charge.22        (3) The total repayment amount.23        (4) The term of the plan, if applicable, or the period 24    over which a draw is amortized.25        (5) The payment frequency and amounts, including a   HB3477 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    description of payment amount requirements such as a 2    minimum payment amount, and if the payment frequency is 3    other than monthly, the amount of the average projected 4    payments per month. For payment amounts that are variable, 5    the provider should include a payment schedule or a 6    description of the method used to calculate the amounts 7    and frequency of payments and the estimated average 8    monthly payment amount.9        (6) A description of all other potential fees and 10    charges that can be avoided by the recipient, including, 11    but not limited to, draw fees, late payment fees, and 12    returned payment fees.13        (7) Were the recipient to elect to pay off or 14    refinance the commercial financing before full repayment, 15    the provider shall disclose:16            (A) whether the recipient would be required to pay 17        any finance charges other than interest accrued since 18        their last payment; if so, disclosure of the maximum 19        dollar amount the recipient could be required to pay; 20        and21            (B) whether the recipient would be required to pay 22        any additional fees not already included in the 23        finance charge.24        (8) A description of collateral requirements or 25    security interests, if any.   HB3477 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    Section 60. Factoring transaction disclosure requirements. 2A provider subject to this Act shall provide the following 3disclosures to a recipient, in a manner prescribed by the 4Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a specific offer 5for a factoring transaction:6        (1) The amount of the receivables purchase price paid 7    to the recipient, and, if different from the purchase 8    price, the disbursement amount after any fees deducted or 9    withheld at disbursement.10        (2) The total cost of the commercial financing, which 11    is the finance charge.12        (3) The total repayment amount.13        (4) A description of all other potential fees and 14    charges that can be avoided by the recipient.15        (5) A description of the receivables purchased and any 16    additional collateral requirements or security interests. 17    Section 65. Other forms of financing disclosure 18requirements. The Secretary may require disclosure by a 19provider extending a specific offer of commercial financing 20which is not an open-end financing, closed-end financing, 21sales-based financing, or factoring transaction but otherwise 22meets the definition of commercial financing. Subject to rules 23adopted by the Secretary, a provider subject to this Act shall 24provide the following disclosures to a recipient, in a manner 25prescribed by the Secretary, if any, at the time of extending a   HB3477 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1specific offer of other forms of financing:2        (1) The total amount of the commercial financing, and, 3    if different from the financing amount, the disbursement 4    amount after any fees deducted or withheld at 5    disbursement.6        (2) The total cost of the commercial financing, which 7    is the finance charge.8        (3) The total repayment amount.9        (4) The term of the financing.10        (5) The payment amounts:11            (A) for payment amounts that are fixed, the 12        payment amounts and frequency, such as daily, weekly, 13        monthly, and the average monthly payment amount; or14            (B) for payment amounts that are variable, a 15        payment schedule or a description of the method used 16        to calculate the amounts and frequency of payments, 17        and the estimated average monthly payment amount.18        (6) A description of all other potential fees and 19    charges that can be avoided by the recipient, including, 20    but not limited to, late payment fees and returned payment 21    fees.22        (7) If the recipient elects to pay off or refinance 23    the commercial financing before full repayment, the 24    provider shall disclose:25            (A) whether the recipient would be required to pay 26        any finance charges other than interest accrued since   HB3477 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1        their last payment; if so, disclosure of the maximum 2        dollar amount the recipient could be required to pay; 3        and4            (B) whether the recipient would be required to pay 5        any additional fees not already included in the 6        finance charge.7        (8) A description of collateral requirements or 8    security interests, if any. 9    Section 70. Disclosure requirements for renewal financing. 10If, as a condition of obtaining the commercial financing, the 11provider requires the recipient to pay off the balance of an 12existing commercial financing from the same provider, the 13provider shall disclose:14        (1) The amount of the new commercial financing that is 15    used to pay off the portion of the existing commercial 16    financing that consists of prepayment charges required to 17    be paid and any unpaid finance charges that were not 18    forgiven at the time of renewal. For financing for which 19    the total repayment amount is calculated as a fixed 20    amount, the prepayment charge is equal to the original 21    finance charge multiplied by the amount of the renewal 22    used to pay off existing financing as a percentage of the 23    total repayment amount, minus any portion of the total 24    repayment amount forgiven by the provider at the time of 25    prepayment. If the amount is more than zero, the amount   HB3477 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    shall be the answer to the following question: "Does the 2    renewal financing include any amount that is used to pay 3    unpaid finance charges? Yes, {enter amount}. If the amount 4    is zero, the answer would be no."5        (2) If the disbursement amount will be reduced to pay 6    down any unpaid portion of the outstanding balance, the 7    actual dollar amount by which the disbursement amount will 8    be reduced. 9    Section 75. Commercial financing facilities and additional 10information. 11    (a) In connection with a commercial financing facility, a 12provider may provide disclosures based on an example of a 13transaction that could occur under the agreement. Only one 14disclosure is required for each commercial financing facility, 15and a disclosure is not required as result of additional funds 16being disbursed, or a modification, forbearance, or change to 17the facility.18    (b) Nothing in this Act shall prevent a provider from 19providing or disclosing additional information on a commercial 20financing being offered to a recipient; however, the 21additional information shall not be disclosed as part of the 22disclosure required by this Act. 23    Section 80. Violation of disclosure requirements. If the 24Secretary finds that a provider who is required to register   HB3477 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1with the Department according to this Act has violated any 2disclosure requirements outlined in Sections 45, 50, 55, 60, 365, 70, and 75, that shall be considered a violation of this 4Act separate from any other violation that may result from 5operating without a registration as required in this Act. 6    Section 90. Notification. 7    (a) A registrant must advise the Secretary in writing of 8any changes to the information submitted on its most recent 9registration or renewal of registration within 30 days after 10the change.11    (b) A registrant must advise the Secretary in writing that 12the registrant has been disciplined, including denial of 13licensure, by a licensing authority of this State or another 14state within 10 days after entry of the discipline. 15    Section 95. Disciplinary actions.16    (a) The Secretary may enter an order imposing one or more 17of the following penalties: 18        (1) revocation of registration; 19        (2) suspension of a registration subject to 20    reinstatement upon satisfying all reasonable conditions 21    the Secretary may specify; 22        (3) placement of the registrant or applicant on 23    probation for a period of time and subject to all 24    reasonable conditions as the Secretary may specify;   HB3477 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1        (4) imposition of civil monetary penalties not to 2    exceed $10,000 for each separate offense, but civil 3    penalties may not to exceed $50,000 for all aggregated 4    violations arising from the use of the same or 5    substantially similar form of disclosure or materials 6    found to be in violation of this Act;7        (5) restitution, refunds, or any other relief 8    necessary to protect recipients; and 9        (6) denial of a registration. 10    (b) Grounds for penalties include:11        (1) if a registrant has violated any provision of this 12    Act;13        (2) if a person has violated any provision of this Act 14    or any rule adopted by the Secretary pursuant to this Act;15        (3) if an applicant made a material misstatement in 16    the applicant's application for registration or any other 17    communication to the Secretary; 18        (4) if a person has failed to advise the Secretary in 19    writing of any changes to the information submitted on the 20    person's most recent registration or renewal of 21    registration within 30 days after the change; and22        (5) if a person failed to timely pay any fee, charge, 23    or civil penalty assessed under this Act.24    (c) No registration shall be suspended or revoked, except 25as provided in this Section, nor shall any person be assessed a 26civil penalty without notice of the right to a hearing.   HB3477 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    (d) No violation of this Act shall impair or affect the 2obligation of any lawful contract between the registrant and 3any person. 4    (e) Every registration issued under this Act shall remain 5in force and effect until the registration expires, is 6surrendered, is revoked, or is suspended in accordance with 7the provisions of this Act. The Secretary shall have authority 8to reinstate a suspended registration or to issue a new 9registration to a registrant whose registration has been 10revoked or surrendered if no fact or condition then exists 11which would have warranted the Secretary in refusing 12originally to issue that registration under this Act. 13    (f) Whenever the Secretary imposes discipline authorized 14by this Section, the Secretary shall execute a written order 15to that effect. The Secretary shall serve a copy of the order 16upon the person. The Secretary shall serve the person with 17notice of the order, including a statement of the reasons for 18the order personally or by certified mail. Service by 19certified mail shall be deemed completed when the notice is 20deposited in the U.S. Mail. 21    (g) An order assessing a civil penalty, an order revoking 22or suspending a registration, or an order denying renewal of a 23registration shall take effect upon service of the order 24unless the registrant serves the Department with a written 25request for a hearing in the manner required by the order 26within 10 days after the date of service of the order. If a   HB3477 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1person requests a hearing, the order shall be stayed from its 2date of service until the Department enters a final 3administrative order. Hearings shall be conducted as follows:4        (1) If the registrant requests a hearing, then the 5    Secretary shall schedule a hearing within 90 days after 6    the request for a hearing unless otherwise agreed to by 7    the parties. 8        (2) The hearing shall be held at the time and place 9    designated by the Secretary. The Secretary and any 10    administrative law judge designated by the Secretary shall 11    have the power to administer oaths and affirmations, 12    subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take 13    evidence, and require the production of books, papers, 14    correspondence, and other records or information that they 15    consider relevant or material to the inquiry. 16    (i) The costs of administrative hearings conducted under 17this Section shall be paid by the registrant or other person 18subject to the hearing. 19    (j) Registrants and other persons subject to this Act 20shall be subject to the disciplinary actions specified in this 21Act for any violations conducted by any officer, director, 22shareholder, joint venture, partner, owner, including, but not 23limited to, ultimate equitable owner. 24    Section 100. Investigation of complaints. The Secretary 25may investigate any complaints and inquiries made concerning   HB3477 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1this Act and any registrants or persons the Secretary believes 2may be required to register under this Act. Each registrant or 3person the Secretary believes may be required to register 4under this Act shall open the registrant's or person's books, 5records, documents, and offices wherever situated to the 6Secretary as needed to facilitate the investigations. 7    Section 105. Additional investigation authority. In 8addition to any authority allowed under this Act, the 9Secretary may conduct investigations as follows:10        (1) Each person subject to this Act shall make 11    available to the Secretary upon request the books and 12    records relating to the operations of the person subject 13    to this Act. The Secretary shall have access to those 14    books and records and may interview the owners, officers, 15    principals, employees, independent contractors, agents, 16    vendors, and customers of any registrant or person subject 17    to this Act. 18        (2) In making any investigation authorized by this 19    Act, the Secretary may control access to any documents and 20    records of the registrant or person under investigation. 21    The Secretary may take possession of the documents and 22    records or otherwise take constructive control of the 23    documents. During the period of control, no person shall 24    remove or alter any of the documents or records, except 25    pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the   HB3477 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    Secretary for purposes outlined in Section 100(5) below. 2    Unless the Secretary has reasonable grounds to believe the 3    documents or records of the registrant have been or are at 4    risk of being altered or destroyed for purposes of 5    concealing a violation of this Act, the registrant or 6    owner of the documents and records shall have access to 7    the documents or records as necessary to conduct its 8    ordinary business affairs. 9        (3) In order to carry out the purposes of this 10    Section, the Secretary may: 11            (A) retain attorneys, accountants, or other 12        professionals and specialists as auditors or 13        investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct of 14        investigations;15            (B) enter into agreements or relationships with 16        other government officials or regulatory associations 17        to protect financing recipients, improve efficiencies, 18        and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, 19        standardized or uniform methods or procedures, and 20        documents, records, information, or evidence obtained 21        under this Section; 22            (C) use, hire, contract, or employ publicly or 23        privately available analytical systems, methods, or 24        software or investigate the registrant or person 25        subject to this Act; 26            (D) accept and rely on examination or   HB3477 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1        investigation reports made by other government 2        officials, within or outside this State; or 3            (E) accept audit reports made by an independent 4        certified public accountant for the person subject to 5        this Act and may incorporate the audit report in the 6        report of the investigation or other writing of the 7        Secretary. 8        (4) The authority of this Section shall remain in 9    effect, whether the person subject to this Act acts or 10    claims to act under any licensing or registration law of 11    this State or claims to act without the authority. 12        (5) No registrant or person subject to investigation 13    or under this Section may knowingly withhold, alter, 14    abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, hide, or conceal any 15    books, records, computer records, or other information or 16    take actions designed to delay or complicate review of 17    records. 18    Section 110. Confidentiality. To promote more effective 19regulation, protect consumers and financing recipients, and 20reduce regulatory burden through inter-regulatory sharing of 21confidential supervisory information: 22        (1) The privacy or confidentiality of any information 23    or material provided to a multistate licensing system, 24    including all privileges arising under federal or state 25    court rules and law, shall continue to apply to the   HB3477 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    information or material after the information or material 2    has been disclosed to the multistate licensing system. 3    Information and material may be shared with a multistate 4    licensing system, federal and state regulatory officials 5    with relevant oversight authority, and law enforcement 6    without the loss of privilege or the loss of 7    confidentiality protections. 8        (2) The Secretary is authorized to enter into 9    agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental 10    agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, and 11    other associations representing governmental agencies. 12        (3) Information or material that is privileged or 13    confidential under this Act as determined by the Secretary 14    is not subject to the following: 15            (A) disclosure under any State law governing the 16        disclosure to the public of information held by an 17        officer or an agency of the State; or 18            (B) subpoena, discovery, or admission into 19        evidence, in any private civil action or 20        administrative process except as authorized by the 21        Secretary. 22        (4) Any other law relating to the disclosure of 23    confidential supervisory information that is inconsistent 24    with this Act shall be superseded by the requirements of 25    this Section to the extent the other law provides less 26    confidentiality or a weaker privilege for information that   HB3477 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    is privileged or confidential under this Act. 2        (5) Confidential or privileged information received 3    from a multistate licensing system, another licensing 4    body, federal and State regulatory officials, or law 5    enforcement shall be protected to the same extent as the 6    Secretary's confidential and privileged information is 7    protected under this Act. The Secretary may also protect 8    from disclosure confidential or privileged information 9    that would be exempt from disclosure to the extent it is 10    held directly by the multistate licensing system, another 11    licensing body, federal and State regulatory officials, or 12    law enforcement. 13    Section 115. Appeal and review. 14    (a) The Secretary may, in accordance with the Illinois 15Administrative Procedure Act, adopt rules to provide for 16review within the Department of their decisions affecting the 17rights of persons under this Act. The review shall provide 18for, at a minimum: 19        (1) appointment of a hearing officer; 20        (2) appropriate procedural rules, specific deadlines 21    for filings, and standards of evidence and of proof; and 22        (3) provisions for apportioning costs among parties to 23    the appeal. 24    (b) All final agency determinations of appeals to 25decisions of the Secretary may be reviewed in accordance with   HB3477 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1and under the provisions of the Administrative Review Law. 2Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by a court 3in review of any final administrative decision of the 4Secretary or of any final agency review of a decision of the 5Secretary may be taken as in other civil cases. 6    Section 120. Registration fees. 7    (a) The fee for initial registration is $2,500. The fee is 8nonrefundable. 9    (b) The fee for annual application renewal is $2,500. The 10fee is nonrefundable. 11    (c) The Department shall impose a contingent fee 12sufficient to cover its operating expenses in administering 13this Act not otherwise covered by all other revenue collected 14under this Act. 15    Section 125. Cease and desist order. 16    (a) The Secretary may issue a cease and desist order to any 17registrant or person doing business without the required 18registration when, in the opinion of the Secretary, the 19registrant or other person has violated, is violating, or is 20about to violate any provision of this Act or any rule adopted 21by the Department under this Act or any requirement imposed in 22writing by the Department as a condition of granting any 23authorization permitted by this Act. The cease and desist 24order authorized by this Section may be issued prior to a   HB3477 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1hearing.2    (b) The Secretary shall serve notice of the cease and 3desist order, either personally or by certified mail. Service 4by certified mail shall be deemed completed when the notice is 5deposited in the U.S. Mail. The Secretary's notice shall 6include a statement of the reasons for the action. 7    (c) Within 10 days after service of the cease and desist 8order, the person subject to the cease and desist order may 9request a hearing in writing. The Secretary shall schedule a 10preliminary hearing within 60 days after the request for a 11hearing unless the parties agree to a later date. 12    (d) If it is determined that the Secretary had the 13authority to issue the cease and desist order, the Secretary 14may issue the orders as may be reasonably necessary to 15correct, eliminate, deter, or remedy the conduct described in 16the order and resulting harms. 17    (e) The powers vested in the Secretary by this Section are 18additional to all other powers and remedies vested in the 19Secretary by any law. Nothing in this Section shall be 20construed as requiring that the Secretary shall employ the 21power conferred in this Section instead of or as a condition 22precedent to the exercise of any other power or remedy vested 23in the Secretary. 24    Section 130. Injunctions. The Secretary may maintain an 25action in the name of the people of this State and may apply   HB3477 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1for an injunction in the circuit court to enjoin a person from 2violating this Act or its implementing rules through the 3Attorney General. 4    Section 135. Exemptions. This Act does not apply to, and 5does not place any additional requirements or obligations 6upon, any of the following: 7        (1) any person or entity that is not a broker or a 8    provider;9        (2) a commercial financing transaction secured by real 10    property;11        (3) a lease as defined in Section 2A-103 of the 12    Uniform Commercial Code or a purchase money obligation as 13    defined in paragraph Section 9-103 of the Uniform 14    Commercial Code that is incurred as all or part of the 15    price of the collateral or for value given to enable the 16    recipient to acquire rights in or the use of the 17    collateral if the value is in fact so used;18        (4) a commercial financing transaction offered by a 19    person in connection with the sale or lease of products or 20    services that such person manufactures, licenses, or 21    distributes, or whose parent company or any of its 22    directly or indirectly owned and controlled subsidiaries 23    manufactures, licenses, or distributes;24        (5) any person or provider who makes no more than 5 25    commercial financing transactions in this State in a   HB3477 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    12-month period;2        (6) a single, discrete commercial financing 3    transaction in an amount over $500,000; or4        (7) a commercial financing transaction in which the 5    recipient is a vehicle dealer subject to Section 5-101 or 6    5-102 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, an affiliate of a 7    dealer, a rental vehicle company as defined in Section 10 8    of the Renter's Financial Responsibility and Protection 9    Act, or an affiliate of a company under a commercial 10    financing agreement or commercial open-end credit plan of 11    at least $50,000, including any commercial loan made 12    pursuant to the commercial financing transaction. 13    Section 140. Complaint disclosure. All commercial 14financing disclosure forms shall include a clear and 15conspicuous notice on how to file a complaint with the 16Department and how to submit a complaint to the provider. 17    Section 145. Rules. The Secretary may adopt rules to enact 18and enforce this Act, including, but not limited to: 19        (1) rules defining the terms used in this Act and as 20    may be necessary and appropriate to interpret and 21    implement the provisions of this Act;22        (2) rules for the enforcement and administration of 23    this Act;    HB3477 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    Section 150. Violations. Nothing in this Act shall be 2construed to restrict the exercise of powers or the 3performance of the duties that the Attorney General is 4authorized to exercise or perform by law. 5    Section 155. Beginning of registration. No person shall be 6required to register under this Act before the date 7established by the Department by rule. The date shall not be 8before January 1, 2026. 9    Section 160. Beginning of disclosure requirements. No 10person shall be required to comply with the disclosure 11requirements set forth in this Act before the date established 12by the Department by rule. The date shall not be before January 131, 2026. 14    Section 165. Commercial financing database. No broker 15shall assess, collect, or solicit an advance fee from a 16business to provide services as a broker, except that nothing 17contained in this Section shall preclude a broker from 18soliciting a business to pay for, or preclude a business from 19paying for, actual services necessary to apply for a 20commercial financing transaction, including, but not limited 21to, a credit check or an appraisal of security, where the 22payment is made by check or money order payable to a party 23independent of the broker; making or using any false or   HB3477 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1misleading representations or omitting any material fact in 2the offer or sale of the services of a broker or engaging, 3directly or indirectly, in any act that operates or would 4operate as fraud or deception upon any person in connection 5with the offer or sale of the services of a broker, 6notwithstanding the absence of reliance by the business; or 7making or using any false or deceptive representation in the 8broker's business dealings. 9    Section 170. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 10severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 11    Section 900. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 12changing Section 7.5 as follows: 13    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)14    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 15by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 16exempt from inspection and copying:17        (a) All information determined to be confidential 18    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 19    Development Act.20        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 21    library users with specific materials under the Library 22    Records Confidentiality Act.23        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical   HB3477 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 2    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 3    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 4    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 5    has received.6        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 7    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 8    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 9    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 10    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 11    Infection Control Act.12        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 13    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.14        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 15    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 16    Qualifications Based Selection Act.17        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 18    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 19    Tuition Act.20        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 21    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 22    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 23    general's office that would be exempt if created or 24    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 25    that Act.26        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy   HB3477 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 2    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 3    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.4        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 5    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 6    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.7        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 8    or driver identification information compiled by a law 9    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 10    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.11        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 12    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 13    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 14    Prevention Review Team Act.15        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 16    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 17    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 18    authorized under that Article.19        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 20    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 21    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 22    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 23    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 24    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 25    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.26        (o) Information that is prohibited from being   HB3477 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 2    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.3        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 4    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 5    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 6    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 7    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 8    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 9    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 10    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 11    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 12    Act (repealed). 13        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 14    Personnel Record Review Act. 15        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 16    Illinois School Student Records Act. 17        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 18    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 19        (t) (Blank). 20        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 21    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 22    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 23        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 24    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 25    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 26    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm   HB3477 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 2    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 3    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 4    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 5    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 6    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 7        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 8    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 9    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.10        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 11    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 12    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.13        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 14    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 15    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 16        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 17    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 18    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 19    information about the identity and administrative finding 20    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 21    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 22    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 23    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 24        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 25    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 26    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services   HB3477 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    Act. 2        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 3    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 4        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 5    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 6        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 7    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 8    authorized under that Act.9        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 11    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 12        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 13    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 14        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 15    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 16        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 17    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 18    Code. 19        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 21        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 23    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 24        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 25    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 26    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from   HB3477 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 2    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 3        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 4    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 5        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 6    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 7    Aid Code. 8        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 9    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 10        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 12        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 13    arising out of a peer support counseling session 14    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 15    Suicide Prevention Act. 16        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 17    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 18    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 19    Prevention Act. 20        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 21    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 22    under the Reproductive Health Act. 23        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 24    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 25        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 26    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois   HB3477 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1    Human Rights Act.2        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 3    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 4    Act. 5        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 6    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 7        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 8    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 9    Public Aid Code. 10        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 11    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 12        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 13    information that shall not be made public under the 14    Illinois Insurance Code. 15        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 16    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.17        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 18    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 19        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 20    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 21        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 22    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 23    Police Act. 24        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 25    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 26    Administrative Code of Illinois.   HB3477 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 2    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 3    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 4    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 5        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 6    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 7    Violence Fatality Review Act. 8        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 9    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 10    July 1, 2025. 11        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 12    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 13    Agency Licensing Act. 14        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 15    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 16    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 17    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 18    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 19    Act. 20        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 21    the School Safety Drill Act. 22        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 23    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 24        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 25    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 26    Act.   HB3477 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 2    2-3.196 of the School Code. 3        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 4    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 5    Power Agency Act. 6        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 7    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 8    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 9        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 10    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 11    Act. 12        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 13    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 14    Act. 15        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 16    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 17        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 18    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 19    Transmission Modernization Act. 20        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 21    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.22        (ttt) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 23    165 of the Small Business Financing Transparency Act. 24(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 25102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 268-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22;   HB3477 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 09252 BAB 19310 b1102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 26-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 3eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 4103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 57-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 6eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 7103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 8    Section 905. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 9Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 10    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)11    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Small Business Financing 12Transparency Act. Any person who violates the Small Business 13Financing Transparency Act commits an unlawful practice within 14the meaning of this Act. 15    Section 995. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act 16makes changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by 17text that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a 18Section represented by multiple versions), the use of that 19text does not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the 20changes made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any 21other Public Act. 22    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.